Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-417
Commission; appeals; district court; procedure.

An appeal from a final order of the commission shall be in the manner provided in sections 25-1901 to 25-1908.

Laws 1971, LB 921, § 15;

Laws 1986, LB 595, § 1;

R.S.1943, (2012), § 23-2515;

Laws 2019, LB411, § 17.

An appeal from a final order of the county civil service commission is a petition in error, not an original breach of contract action against the county under section 23-135. Pierce v. Douglas Cty. Civil Serv. Comm., 275 Neb. 722, 748 N.W.2d 660 (2008).

The district court had jurisdiction over a former employee's petition in error claiming that the county public properties department breached grievance procedures under a collective bargaining agreement in terminating his employment. Pierce v. Douglas Cty. Civil Serv. Comm., 275 Neb. 722, 748 N.W.2d 660 (2008).

When the county civil service commission acts in a judicial manner, a party adversely affected by its decision is entitled to appeal to the district court through the petition in error statutes. Pierce v. Douglas Cty. Civil Serv. Comm., 275 Neb. 722, 748 N.W.2d 660 (2008).